Illinois, session 104th, HB4702.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Diaper 5Labeling Act. 6    Section 5. Purpose. The purpose of this Act is to protect 7adults, parents, and small children who may be allergic to 8ingredients that may be present in diapers. 9    Section 10. Definitions. In this Act:10    "Diaper" means a type of garment or product inserted into 11a garment for the purpose of absorbing feces and urine to 12prevent soiling of outer clothing or the external environment 13without the use of a toilet. "Diaper" includes either 14disposable or reusable products.15    "Ingredient" means an intentionally added substance 16present in a diaper. 17    Section 15. Diaper ingredient list. No later than 18 18months after the effective date of this Act, each package or 19box containing diapers sold in this State shall contain a 20plain and conspicuous printed list of all ingredients in order 21of predominance, except that ingredients present at one   HB4702 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 17688 BDA 31119 b1percent or less may be listed in any order. The list shall 2either be printed on the package or box or affixed to the 3package or box. When an ingredient qualifies as confidential 4or a trade secret under applicable law, the manufacturer may 5list the common or functional name in place of the specific 6chemical identity. A product manufactured prior to the 7effective date of this Act that does not comply with the 8requirements of this Act may be sold, distributed, or 9otherwise made available for sale in this State until existing 10inventory is depleted. 11    Section 20. Other labeling requirements. The requirements 12of this Act shall apply in addition to any other labeling 13requirements established under any other law. 14    Section 25. Enforcement; penalties. A person who sells or 15distributes diapers in this State in violation of Section 15 16of this Act is subject to a civil penalty of 1% of the person's 17total annual in-State sales of diapers not to exceed $1,000 18per package or box. The State's Attorney of the county where 19the violation occurred or the Attorney General may enforce 20this Act by bringing a civil action to collect civil penalties 21and by seeking an injunction to prevent any activity in 22violation of this Act.